Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
PERPETUATION OF TESTIMONY

Note

Part heading renumbered by L 1972, c 143, §1(o).

§624-41 Action for. (a) A person who,
before action, desires to perpetuate the person's own testimony or the
testimony of any other person, may proceed in accordance with the rules of
court or may bring a civil action in the circuit court of any circuit in which
it is fair and equitable to the parties that the matter be heard, setting
forth:

(1) That the plaintiff expects to be a party to an
action cognizable in a court of this State but is presently unable to bring it
or cause it to be brought;

(2) The subject matter of the expected action and the
plaintiff's interest therein;

(3) The facts that the plaintiff desires to establish
by the proposed testimony and the plaintiff's reasons for desiring to
perpetuate it;

(4) The names of the persons the plaintiff expects
will be adverse parties and their addresses; and

(5) The names and addresses of the persons to be
examined and the substance of the testimony that the plaintiff expects to
elicit from each; and

praying for an order authorizing the plaintiff to
take the depositions of the persons to be examined named in the action, for the
purpose of perpetuating their testimony.

(b) Personal service shall be made on the
expected adverse parties as in other civil actions. In case service cannot be
made in the State, service may be made as provided by sections 634-24 and
634-25, but if an action is brought under this section, service shall not be
made by publication. [L 1876, c 32, §27; RL 1925, §2590; RL 1935, §3884; RL
1945, §9870; RL 1955, §223-23; HRS §624-41; am L 1972, c 143, §1(h); am L 2016,
c 55, §24]

Rules of Court

See HRCP rule 27.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next